Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1107
Learners with high ability; terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 79-1106 to 79-1108.03:

(1) Approved accelerated or differentiated curriculum programs means academic programs that serve the educational needs of learners with high ability developed and approved under section 79-1108;

(2) Department means the State Department of Education; and

(3) Learner with high ability means a student that performs, or has the capacity to perform, at greater levels in one or more domains of instruction in comparison to individuals of the same age, educational experience, or environment and who requires accelerated or differentiated curriculum programs in order to develop those abilities fully.

Laws 1994, LB 647, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-4002;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 789;

Laws 1997, LB 347, § 35;

Laws 1998, LB 1229, § 7;

Laws 2024, LB1329, § 83.